Missouri, session 2026, SB1124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 361.972, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
361.972 and 361.979, to read as follows:
361.972. 1. A licensee shall maintain the following
records for determining its compliance with sections 361.900
to 361.1035 for at least three years:
(1) A record of each outstanding money transmission
obligation sold;
(2) A general ledger posted at least monthly
containing all asset, liability, capital, income, and
expense accounts;
(3) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(4) Records of outstanding money transmission
obligations;
(5) Records of each outstanding money transmission
obligation paid within the three-year period;
(6) A list of the last known names and addresses of
all of the licensee's authorized delegates; [and]
(7) Records of:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1124 2
(a) The documentation used to verify that the sender
of a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized
alien as such term is defined in section 361.979;
(b) Penalties paid pursuant to section 361.979,
including the date and amount of each foreign remittance
transfer and the name, date of birth, and address of each
sender; and
(8) Any other records the director reasonably requires
by rule.
2. The items specified in subsection 1 of this section
may be maintained in any form of record.
3. Records specified in subsection 1 of this section
may be maintained outside this state if the records are made
accessible to the director on seven business days' notice
that is sent in a record.
4. All records maintained by the licensee as required
in subsections 1 to 3 of this section are open to inspection
by the director under subsection 1 of section 361.921.
5. (1) For the purpose of enforcement of this
section, the division may at any time request, and the
licensee shall provide, records of documentation used to
verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is
not an unauthorized alien.
(2) A person who has a good faith belief that a
licensee is failing to comply with section 361.979 may file
a complaint with the division.
(3) A person who knowingly files a false or frivolous
complaint under subdivision (2) of this subsection,
including any complaint that violates federal law, commits a
class B misdemeanor.
(4) Upon receipt of a valid complaint substantiated by
evidence of a violation of section 361.979, the division

SB 1124 3
shall notify the licensee of the complaint and direct the
licensee to pay a penalty pursuant to section 361.979.
(5) In addition to the requirements under subdivision
(1) of this subsection, beginning July 1, 2027, the division
shall conduct random quarterly audits of licensees to ensure
compliance with section 361.979. During an audit, a
licensee shall produce records of the documentation used to
verify that each sender of a foreign remittance transfer is
not an unauthorized alien. A licensee that fails to comply
with section 361.979 is subject to the penalty pursuant to
such section.
(6) Failure to comply with subdivision (5) of this
subsection constitutes grounds for the suspension of all
licenses held by the licensee that were issued by the
division.
(7) The division may not audit a licensee more than
once every two years unless an audit within the last six
months found the licensee out of compliance with section
361.979.
361.979. 1. (1) A licensee shall not initiate a
foreign remittance transfer unless the licensee has verified
that the sender is not an unauthorized alien.
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Foreign remittance transfer", a remittance
transfer as defined in the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15
U.S.C. Section 1693o-1, as amended, the recipient of which
is located in any country other than the United States; and
(b) "Unauthorized alien", a person who is unlawfully
present in the United States according to the terms of the
federal Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. Section
1101, et seq. The term shall be interpreted consistently
with any applicable federal statutes, rules, or regulations.

SB 1124 4
(3) The division shall adopt rules relating to
acceptable forms of documentation that a licensee shall use
to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer
is not an unauthorized alien. The licensee shall provide
confirmation of verification on such forms as the division
may prescribe for this purpose. All required forms shall be
submitted to the division not later than the fifteenth day
of the month following the close of each calendar quarter.
2. A licensee shall pay a penalty equal to twenty-five
percent of the United States dollar amount transferred,
excluding any fees or charges imposed by the licensee, for
any foreign remittance transfer initiated in violation of
subsection 1 of this section. The licensee shall remit
penalties owed under this subsection quarterly to the
division in addition to any such forms as the division may
prescribe for such purpose. All required penalties and
forms shall be submitted to the division not later than the
fifteenth day of the month following the close of each
calendar quarter. Failure to comply with subsection 1 of
this section does not subject a licensee to any penalty
other than the penalty imposed by this subsection.
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
or the application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
✓